Utah statutes.
70A-9a-623.   Right to redeem collateral.

(1) A debtor, any secondary obligor, or any other secured party or lienholder may redeem collateral.

(2)  To redeem collateral, a person shall tender:

(a)  fulfillment of all obligations secured by the collateral; and

(b)  the reasonable expenses and attorney's fees described in Subsection 70A-9a-615(1)(a).

(3)  A redemption may occur at any time before a secured party:

(a)  has collected collateral under Section 70A-9a-607;

(b)  has disposed of collateral or entered into a contract for its disposition under Section 70A-9a-610; or

(c)  has accepted collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures under Section 70A-9a-622.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

